test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pottaak_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - pottáák: # 1B
    pottáák+N+Sg+Nom: pottáák
    pottáák+N+Sg+Gen: pottáák
    pottáák+N+Sg+Acc: pottáák
    pottáák+N+Sg+Ill: potákkân
    pottáák+N+Sg+Loc: potákkist
    pottáák+N+Sg+Com: potákkáin
    pottáák+N+Sg+Abe: pottáákttáá
    pottáák+N+Ess: potákkin
    pottáák+N+Par: potákkid
    pottáák+N+Pl+Nom: potákkeh
    pottáák+N+Pl+Gen: potákkij
    pottáák+N+Pl+Acc: potákkijd
    pottáák+N+Pl+Ill: potákkáid
    pottáák+N+Pl+Loc: potákkijn
    pottáák+N+Pl+Com: potákkijguin
    pottáák+N+Pl+Abe: potákkijttáá
